North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 18A. Presidential Preference Primary Act.

§ 163-213.1.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as the “Presidential Preference Primary Act.”

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.2.
Primary to be held; date; qualifications and registration of voters.

On the Tuesday after the first Monday in March, 2020, and every four years thereafter, the voters of this State shall be given an opportunity to express their preference for the person to be the presidential candidate of their political party.

Any person otherwise qualified who will become qualified by age to vote in the general election held in the same year of the presidential preference primary shall be entitled to register and vote in the presidential preference primary. Such persons may
register not earlier than 60 days nor later than the last day for making application to register under

G.S. 163-82.6

prior to the said primary. In addition, persons who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for which the primary is held, who do not register during the special period may register to
vote after such period as if they were qualified on the basis of age, but until they are qualified by age to vote, they may vote only in primary elections.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; c. 844, s. 18; 1977, c. 19; c. 661, s. 7; 1983, c. 331, s. 5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 927, s. 1; 1987, c. 457, s. 3; 1991, c. 689, s. 15(a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 6; 1999-424,
s. 7(j); 2013-381, s. 35.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-21, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.3.
Conduct of election.

The presidential preference primary election shall be conducted and canvassed by the same authority and in the manner provided by law for the conduct and canvassing of the primary election for the office of Governor and all other offices enumerated in
G.S. 163-182.4(b) and under the same provisions stipulated in G.S. 163-182.5(c). The State Board of Elections shall have authority to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with provisions contained herein, pursuant
to the administration of this Article.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 1987, c. 81, s. 2; 1991, c. 689, s. 15(b); 2001-398, s. 9; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.4.
Nomination by State Board of Elections.

No later than 90 days preceding the North Carolina presidential preference primary, the chair of each political party shall submit to the State Board of Elections a list of its presidential candidates to be placed on the presidential preference primary
ballot. The list must be comprised of candidates whose candidacy is generally advocated and recognized in the news media throughout the United States or in North Carolina, unless any such candidate executes and files with the chair
of the political party an affidavit stating without qualification that the candidate is not and does not intend to become a candidate for nomination in the North Carolina Presidential Preference Primary Election. The State Board of
Elections shall prepare and publish a list of the names of the presidential candidates submitted. The State Board of Elections shall convene in Raleigh on the first Tuesday in January preceding the presidential preference primary election,
unless the first Tuesday in January is the first day of that month, in which case the State Board shall meet on January 2. At the meeting required by this section, the State Board of Elections shall nominate as presidential primary
candidates all candidates affiliated with a political party, recognized pursuant to the provisions of Article 9 of this Chapter, who have been submitted to the State Board of Elections. Additionally, the State Board of Elections, by
vote of at least three of its members in the affirmative, may nominate as a presidential primary candidate any other person affiliated with a political party that it finds is generally advocated and recognized in the news media throughout
the United States or in North Carolina as candidates for the nomination by that party. Immediately upon completion of these requirements, the State Board shall release to the news media all such nominees selected. Provided, however,
nothing shall prohibit the partial selection of nominees prior to the meeting required by this section, if all provisions herein have been complied with.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 1983, c. 729; 1987, c. 81, s. 1; c. 549, s. 6.1; 1991, c. 689, s. 15(c); 2003-278, s. 9(a); 2007-391, s. 33; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2013-381, ss. 35.2, 36.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.5.
Nomination by petition.

Any person seeking the endorsement by the national political party for the office of President of the United States, or any group organized in this State on behalf of, and with the consent of, such person, may file with the State Board of Elections petitions
signed by 10,000 persons who, at the time they signed are registered and qualified voters in this State and are affiliated, by such registration, with the same political party as the candidate for whom the petitions are filed. Such
petitions shall be presented to the county board of elections 10 days before the filing deadline and shall be certified promptly by the chairman of the board of elections of the county in which the signatures were obtained and shall
be filed by the petitioners with the State Board of Elections no later than 5:00 P.M. on the Monday prior to the date the State Board of Elections is required to meet as directed by

G.S. 163-213.4

.

The petitions must state the name of the candidate for nomination, along with a letter of approval signed by such candidate. Said petitions must also state the name and address of the chairman of any such group organized to circulate petitions authorized
under this section. The requirement for signers of such petitions shall be the same as now required under provisions of

G.S. 163-96

(b)(1) and (2). The requirement of the respective chairmen of county boards of elections shall be the same as now required under the provisions of

G.S. 163-96

as they relate to the chairman of the county board of elections.

The State Board of Elections shall forthwith determine the sufficiency of petitions filed with it and shall immediately communicate its determination to the chairman of such group organized to circulate petitions. The form and style of petition shall
be as prescribed by the State Board of Elections.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 2002-159, s. 55(e); 2003-278, s. 9(b); 2004-127, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.6.
Notification to candidates.

The State Board of Elections shall forthwith contact each person who has been nominated by the State Board or by petition and notify him in writing that his name will be printed as a candidate of a specified political party on the North Carolina presidential
preference primary ballot. A candidate who participates in the North Carolina presidential preference primary of a particular party shall have his name placed on the general election ballot only as a nominee of that political party.
The State Board shall send a copy of the “Presidential Preference Primary Act” to each candidate with the notice specified above.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 1987, c. 549, s. 6.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.7.
Voting in presidential preference primary; ballots.

The names of all candidates in the presidential preference primary shall appear at an appropriate place on the ballot or voting machine. In addition the State Board of Elections shall provide a category on the ballot or voting machine allowing voters
in each political party to vote an “uncommitted” or “no preference” status. The voter shall be able to cast his ballot for one of the presidential candidates of a political party or for an “uncommitted” or “no preference” status, but
shall not be permitted to vote for candidates or “uncommitted” status of a political party different from his registration. Persons registered as “Unaffiliated” shall not participate in the presidential primary except as provided in

G.S. 163-119

.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 52; 2004-127, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.8.
Allocation of delegate positions to reflect division of votes in the primary.

Upon completion and certification of the primary results by the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State shall certify the results to the State chairman of each political party.Each political party shall allocate delegate positions in a manner
which reflects the division of votes of the party primary consistent with the national party rules of that political party.

In case of conflict between subsection (a) of this section and the national rules of a political party, the State executive committee of that party has the authority to resolve the conflict by adopting for that party the national rules, which shall then
supercede any provision in subsection (a) of this section with which it conflicts, provided that the executive committee shall take only such action under this subsection necessary to resolve the conflict.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 1979, c. 800; 1983, c. 216, ss. 1, 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.9.
National committee to be notified of provisions under this Article.

It shall be the responsibility of the State chairman of each political party, qualified under the laws of this State, to notify his party’s national committee no later than January 30 of each year in which such presidential preference primary shall be
conducted of the provisions contained under this Article.

History.
1971, c. 225; 1975, c. 744; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-213.10.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 163-213.9

by Session Laws 1975, c. 744.

§ 163-213.11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 689, s. 15.

§§ 163-214 through 163-217.

Reserved for future codification purposes.